Tennessee, session 114, SB0029.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-309, is amended by deleting
subsection (d) and substituting:
(1)
(A) Except as provided in subdivision (d)(1)(B), a violation of subsection
(b) is a Class D felony.
(B) A violation of subsection (b) is a Class C felony if the victim of the
offense was:
(i) A minor under eighteen (18) years of age; or
(ii) Selected by the defendant based on the victim's status as a
minister, preacher, pastor, priest, rabbi, or other spiritual leader of a
religious belief who has been ordained or otherwise designated in
conformity with the customs of a church, temple, or other religious group
or organization.
(2) A violation of subsection (c) is a Class A misdemeanor.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0029
000133
- 1 -